Illinois, session 104th, HB4286.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act is amended 5by changing Section 10-45 as follows: 6    (410 ILCS 705/10-45)7    Sec. 10-45. Cannabis Equity Commission.8    (a) The Cannabis Equity Commission is created and shall 9reflect the diversity of the State of Illinois, including 10geographic, racial, and ethnic diversity. The Cannabis Equity 11Commission shall be responsible for the following:12        (1) Ensuring that equity goals in the Illinois 13    cannabis industry, as stated in Section 10-40, are met.14        (2) Tracking and analyzing minorities in the 15    marketplace.16        (3) Ensuring that revenue is being invested properly 17    into R3 areas under Section 10-40.18        (4) Recommending changes to make the law more 19    equitable to communities harmed the most by the war on 20    drugs.21        (5) Create standards to protect true social equity 22    applicants from predatory businesses.23    (b) The Cannabis Equity Commission's ex officio members   HB4286- 2 -LRB104 16996 BDA 30410 b1shall, within 4 months after March 23, 2021 (the effective 2date of Public Act 101-658), convene the Commission to appoint 3a full Cannabis Equity Commission and oversee, provide 4guidance to, and develop an administrative structure for the 5Cannabis Equity Commission. The ex officio members are:6        (1) The Governor, or his or her designee, who shall 7    serve as chair.8        (2) The Attorney General, or his or her designee.9        (3) The Director of Commerce and Economic Opportunity, 10    or his or her designee.11        (4) The Director of Public Health, or his or her 12    designee.13        (5) The Director of Corrections, or his or her 14    designee.15        (6) The Secretary of Financial and Professional 16    Regulation, or his or her designee.17        (7) The Director of Agriculture, or his or her 18    designee.19        (8) The Executive Director of the Illinois Criminal 20    Justice Information Authority, or his or her designee.21        (9) The Secretary of Human Services, or his or her 22    designee.23        (10) A member of the Senate, designated by the 24    President of the Senate.25        (11) A member of the House of Representatives, 26    designated by the Speaker of the House of Representatives.  HB4286- 3 -LRB104 16996 BDA 30410 b1        (12) A member of the Senate, designated by the 2    Minority Leader of the Senate.3        (13) A member of the House of Representatives, 4    designated by the Minority Leader of the House of 5    Representatives.6        (14) The chairperson of the Agriculture Committee of 7    the Senate, or his or her designee, who shall serve as 8    co-chair.9        (15) The chairperson of the Agriculture and 10    Conservation Committee of the House of Representatives, or 11    his or her designee, who shall serve as co-chair.12        (16) A member of the Senate who is a member of the 13    Illinois Black Caucus, designated by the Illinois Black 14    Caucus Senate Chair. 15        (17) A member of the House of Representatives who is a 16    member of the Illinois Black Caucus, designated by the 17    Illinois Black Caucus House Chair. 18        (18) A member of the Senate who is a member of the 19    Illinois Legislative Latino Caucus, designated by the 20    Illinois Legislative Latino Caucus Co-Chair who is a 21    member of the Senate. 22        (19) A member of the House of Representatives who is a 23    member of the Illinois Legislative Latino Caucus, 24    designated by the Illinois Legislative Latino Caucus 25    Co-Chair who is a member of the House of Representatives. 26    (c) Within 90 days after the ex officio members convene,   HB4286- 4 -LRB104 16996 BDA 30410 b1as well as within 90 days after a vacancy in membership under 2this subsection, the following members shall be appointed to 3the Commission by the co-chairs chair:4        (1) Four community-based providers or community 5    development organization representatives who provide 6    services to treat violence and address the social 7    determinants of health, or promote community investment, 8    including, but not limited to, services such as job 9    placement and training, educational services, workforce 10    development programming, and wealth building. No more than 11    2 community-based organization representatives shall work 12    primarily in Cook County. At least one of the 13    community-based providers shall have expertise in 14    providing services to an immigrant population.15        (2) Two experts in the field of violence reduction.16        (3) One male who has previously been incarcerated and 17    is over the age of 24 at the time of appointment.18        (4) One female who has previously been incarcerated 19    and is over the age of 24 at the time of appointment.20        (5) Two individuals who have previously been 21    incarcerated and are between the ages of 17 and 24 at the 22    time of appointment.23        (6) One individual who is a journalist and 24    representative of the news media with work experience 25    covering the national and local cannabis market as well as 26    issues related to disproportionately impacted areas.  HB4286- 5 -LRB104 16996 BDA 30410 b1    As used in this subsection (c), "an individual who has 2been previously incarcerated" has the same meaning as defined 3in paragraph (2) of subsection (e) of Section 10-40.4    (d) The Cannabis Equity Commission shall issue a report to 5the General Assembly on or before January 1, 2028, and 6annually thereafter, that includes, without limitation, an 7evaluation of the current market, data regarding social equity 8operations in the State, community reinvestment data from the 9Restore, Reinvest, and Renew (R3) Program, and tax revenues, 10as well as recommendations for policy changes that focus on 11supporting social equity applicants, operators, and 12communities harmed the most by the failed war on drugs.13(Source: P.A. 104-417, eff. 8-15-25.)